Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 5. Occupational Safety and Health

§ 221.
State plan and cooperation.

The State of Vermont desires to assume responsibility for the development and enforcement of occupational safety and health standards within the State.
To that end the Commissioner shall submit plans and reports to the appropriate federal official or agency, under the provisions of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (PL. 91-596), enacted by the Congress of the United States of America.
The Department and the Division shall cooperate with the appropriate federal agencies in carrying out the purposes of the Act and the VOSHA Code.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 222.
Application.

The VOSHA Code shall apply with respect to employers, employees, and employment in or at a work place in the State of Vermont, except that:

Standards applicable to products which are distributed or used in interstate commerce which are different from federal standards for such products shall not be promulgated under the VOSHA Code unless such standards are required by compelling local conditions and do not unduly burden interstate commerce.

Nothing in the VOSHA Code shall be construed to supersede or in any manner affect the workers’ compensation laws of this State pursuant to chapters 9 and 11 of this title, or enlarge or diminish or affect in any other manner the common law or statutory rights, duties, or liabilities of employers and employees under any law with respect to injuries, diseases, or death of employees arising out of, or in the course of employment.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 223.
Duties.

Each employer shall furnish to each of his or her employees employment and a place of employment which are free from recognized hazards that are causing or are likely to cause death or significant physical harm to his or her employees; and the employer shall comply with safety and health standards promulgated under the VOSHA Code.

Each employee shall comply with the safety and health standards and all rules, regulations, and orders of the VOSHA Code which are applicable to his or her own actions or conduct.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

For effective date of this section, see note set out under § 201 of this title.

§ 224.
Rules and standards.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules and standards necessary to implement the purposes and duties set forth in this subchapter insofar as they relate to safety and to enforcement of the VOSHA Code.

The Commissioner, in consultation with the Secretary of Human Services, shall adopt rules and standards necessary to implement the purposes of the VOSHA Code and duties thereunder, insofar as they relate to health.

Any standard adopted under this section shall prescribe the use of labels or other appropriate forms of warning as are necessary to inform employees of all safety or health hazards to which they are exposed, relevant symptoms and appropriate emergency treatment, and proper conditions and precautions for safe use or exposure. Where appropriate, a rule shall prescribe suitable protective clothing, devices, or equipment which shall be provided by the employer, and control or technological procedures to be used in connection with the safety or health hazard; and shall provide for monitoring or measuring employee exposure at such locations and intervals and in such manner as may be necessary for the protection of employees.

Where appropriate, a standard adopted in consultation with the Secretary of Human Services may prescribe the type and frequency of medical examinations or other tests which shall be made available by an employer or at the expense of the employer, to employees exposed to health hazards in employment, in order to effectively determine whether the health of the employee is adversely affected by exposure to the hazard. In the event medical examinations are in the nature of research, as determined by the Secretary of Human Services, such examinations may be furnished at the expense of the State. The results of the examinations or tests shall be furnished only to the Secretary of Human Services, the Commissioner of Health, the Director of Occupational Health, the Commissioner of Labor, and at the request of the employee, to the employee’s physician and the employee.

The Commissioner, in consultation with the Secretary, in adopting standards dealing with toxic materials or harmful physical agents under this section, shall set the standard which most adequately ensures, to the extent feasible, on the basis of the best available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairment of health or functional capacity even if such employee has regular exposure to the hazard dealt with by such standard for the period of his or her working life. Development of standards under this subsection shall be based upon research, demonstrations, experiments, and such other information as may be appropriate. In addition to the attainment of the highest degree of safety and health protection for the employee, other considerations shall be the latest available scientific data in the field, the feasibility of the standards, and experience gained under this and other safety and health laws. Whenever practicable, the standard adopted shall be expressed in terms of objective criteria and of the performance desired.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2015, No. 23

, § 119;

2015, No. 87

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 54.

§ 225.
Citations.

If, upon inspection or investigation, the Commissioner or the Director or the agent of either of them finds that an employer has violated a requirement of the VOSHA Code, the Commissioner shall with reasonable promptness issue a citation to the employer and serve it on the employer by certified mail or in the same manner as a summons to the Superior Court. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the provisions of the statute, standard, rule, or order alleged to have been violated, as well as the penalty, if any, proposed to be assessed pursuant to section 210 of this title. In addition, the citation shall fix a reasonable time for the abatement of the violation.
(a) (1) If, upon inspection or investigation, the Commissioner or the Director or the agent of either of them finds that an employer has violated a requirement of the VOSHA Code, the Commissioner shall with reasonable promptness issue a citation to the employer and serve it on the employer by certified mail or in the same manner as a summons to the Superior Court. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the provisions of the statute, standard, rule, or order alleged to have been violated, as well as the penalty, if any, proposed to be assessed pursuant to section 210 of this title. In addition, the citation shall fix a reasonable time for the abatement of the violation.

By rule, the Commissioner shall adopt procedures for issuance of a notice in lieu of a citation with respect to de minimis violations that have no direct or immediate relationship to safety or health and for hearing interested parties before a civil penalty is assessed.

Each citation issued under this section, or a copy or copies of the citation, shall be prominently posted, as prescribed in rules adopted by the Commissioner, at or near each place a violation referred to in the citation occurred or existed.

A citation issued under this section may be served by an agent of the Commissioner, who shall make return in the same manner as sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, or constables make after serving a summons.

A citation may not be issued after six months following the inspection or investigation that reveals the violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 54

, § 69, eff. June 1, 2009;

2017, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 226.
Enforcement.

An employer shall, within 20 days after personal service or receipt of a citation issued under section 225 of this title, notify the Commissioner that he or she wishes to appeal the citation or proposed penalty.
(a) (1) An employer shall, within 20 days after personal service or receipt of a citation issued under section 225 of this title, notify the Commissioner that he or she wishes to appeal the citation or proposed penalty.

If an employer does not notify the Commissioner as provided in this subsection and an employee does not file a notice under subsection (c) of this section, the citation and penalty, as proposed, shall be deemed a final order of the Review Board and not subject to review by any court or agency.

If the Commissioner on inspection or investigation finds that an employer has failed to correct a violation for which a citation has been issued within the period permitted for its correction, the Commissioner shall notify the employer by certified mail of the failure and of the penalty proposed to be assessed under section 210 of this title by reason of the failure.
(b) (1) (A) If the Commissioner on inspection or investigation finds that an employer has failed to correct a violation for which a citation has been issued within the period permitted for its correction, the Commissioner shall notify the employer by certified mail of the failure and of the penalty proposed to be assessed under section 210 of this title by reason of the failure.

The period to correct a violation shall begin to run:

when a final order is entered by the Review Board in relation to review proceedings under this section that are initiated by an employer in good faith and not solely for delay or avoidance of penalties; or

on the day the citation and penalty become final under subsection (a) of this section.

The employer shall have 20 days after the receipt of the notice to notify the Commissioner that he or she wishes to appeal the Commissioner’s citation or the proposed penalty. If, within 20 days from the receipt of the notification issued by the Commissioner, the employer fails to notify the Commissioner that he or she intends to appeal, the citation and assessment, as proposed, shall be deemed a final order of the Review Board and not subject to review by any court or agency.

If an employer notifies the Commissioner that the employer intends to contest a citation issued under section 225 of this title, or if, within 20 days after the issuance of a citation under section 225 of this title, any employee or representative of employees files a notice with the Commissioner alleging that the period of time fixed in the citation for the abatement of the violation is unreasonable, the Commissioner shall immediately advise the Review Board of the notification and the Review Board shall afford an opportunity for a hearing. Unless a notice is timely filed, the proposed penalty and, in appropriate cases, the citation shall be deemed a final order of the Review Board not subject to review by any court or agency.

After hearing an appeal, the Review Board shall issue an order based on findings of fact that affirms, modifies, or vacates the Commissioner’s citation or proposed penalty, or both, or provides other appropriate relief. The order shall become final 30 days after its issuance unless judicial review is timely taken under section 227 of this title. The rules of procedure adopted by the Review Board shall provide affected employees or their representatives with an opportunity to participate as parties in a hearing under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2017, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 21, 2018;

2021, No. 20

, § 215.

§ 227.
Judicial review.

Any person adversely affected or aggrieved by an order of the Review Board may appeal to any Superior Court for the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred or where the employer has its principal office. The appeal shall be taken within 30 days following the issuance of such order. The court shall have power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper, and to make and enter upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in such record a decree affirming, modifying, or setting aside in whole or in part, the order of the Review Board and enforcing the same to the extent that such order is affirmed or modified. The commencement of proceedings under this subsection shall not, unless ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the order of the Review Board. No objection that has not been urged before the Review Board shall be considered by the court, unless the failure or neglect to urge such objection shall be excused because of extraordinary circumstances. The findings of the Review Board with respect to questions of fact, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. If any party shall apply to the court for leave to adduce additional evidence and shall show to the satisfaction of the court that such additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for failure to adduce such evidence in the hearing before the Review Board, the court may order such additional evidence to be taken before the Review Board and to be made a part of the record. The Review Board may modify its findings as to the facts, or make new findings, by reason of additional evidence so taken and filed, and it shall file such modified or new findings, which findings with respect to questions of fact, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive, and its recommendations, if any, for the modification or setting aside of its original order. Upon the filing of the record with it, the jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive and its judgment and decree shall be final, except that the same shall be subject to review by the Supreme Court. Judicial review under this subsection shall be considered expeditiously.

The Commissioner may also obtain a review or enforcement of any final order of the Review Board by filing a petition for such relief in the Superior Court within the jurisdiction of which the alleged violation occurred or in which the employer has its principal office and the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall govern such proceedings to the extent applicable. If judicial review is not sought within 30 days after service of the Review Board’s order, the Review Board’s findings of fact and order shall be conclusive in connection with any petition for enforcement which is filed by the Commissioner after the expiration of such 30-day period. In any such case, as well as in the case of a noncontested citation or notification by the Commissioner, which has become a final order of the Review Board, the clerk of the court, unless otherwise ordered by the court, shall forthwith enter a decree enforcing the order and shall transmit a copy of such court decree to the Commissioner and the employer named in the petition. In any contempt proceeding brought to enforce a court decree entered pursuant to this subsection or subsection (a) of this section, the court may assess the penalties provided in addition to invoking any other available remedies.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

§ 228.
Reports.

Employers shall keep and file all reports and records required under the Act, and any reports and records which the Commissioner or the Secretary of Human Services may require by rule.

The Commissioner shall make such reports to the Secretary of Labor in such form and containing such information as the Secretary shall from time to time require.

Each employer shall make, keep, and preserve, and make available to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Labor or the Secretary of Health and Human Services, such records regarding his or her activities relating to the Act as the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Labor, in cooperation with the Secretary of Health and Human Services, may prescribe by regulation as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the Act or for developing information regarding the causes and prevention of occupational accidents and illnesses. In order to carry out the provisions of this subdivision, such regulations may include provisions requiring employers to conduct periodic inspections. The Commissioner shall also issue regulations requiring that employers, through posting of notices or other appropriate means, keep their employees informed of their protections and obligations under this Code, including the provisions of applicable standards.
(c) (1) Each employer shall make, keep, and preserve, and make available to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Labor or the Secretary of Health and Human Services, such records regarding his or her activities relating to the Act as the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Labor, in cooperation with the Secretary of Health and Human Services, may prescribe by regulation as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the Act or for developing information regarding the causes and prevention of occupational accidents and illnesses. In order to carry out the provisions of this subdivision, such regulations may include provisions requiring employers to conduct periodic inspections. The Commissioner shall also issue regulations requiring that employers, through posting of notices or other appropriate means, keep their employees informed of their protections and obligations under this Code, including the provisions of applicable standards.

The Commissioner in cooperation with the Secretary, shall issue regulations requiring employees to maintain accurate records of employee exposures to potentially toxic materials or harmful physical agents which are required to be monitored or measured under section 224 of this title. Such regulations shall provide employees or their representative with an opportunity to observe such monitoring or measuring, and to have access to the records thereof. Such regulations shall also make appropriate provision for each employee or former employee to have access to such records as will indicate his or her own exposure to toxic materials or harmful physical agents. Each employer shall promptly notify any employee who has been or is being exposed to toxic materials or harmful physical agents in concentrations or at levels which exceed those prescribed by an applicable occupational safety and health standard promulgated under section 224 of this title and shall inform any employee who is being thus exposed of the corrective action being taken.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 229.
Repealed. 2009, No. 135 (Adj. Sess.), § 26(9).

§ 230.
Occupational Safety and Health Review Board.

An Occupational Safety and Health Review Board is created. It shall consist of three members who shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. The members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of six years, but initially in a manner so that one term expires in two years, one term in four years, and one term in six years. Thereafter, biennially, in the month of February, with the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint a person as a member of such Board for the term of six years, whose term of office shall commence on March 1 of the year in which such appointment is made. The Governor, biennially, shall designate a member of such Board to be its Chair.

With the approval of the Secretary of Administration, the Board may employ such employees as it deems necessary, and may without such approval employ and remove a clerk and a reporter for taking and transcribing testimony in hearings before it and such hearing judges as it deems necessary to hear appeals on behalf of the Board. Compensation for employees of the Board shall be fixed by the Commissioner of Human Resources. The hearing judge appointed by the Board shall hear, and make a determination upon, any proceeding instituted before the Board and any motion in connection therewith, assigned to such hearing judge by the Chair of the Board, and shall make a report of any such determination which constitutes his or her final disposition of the proceedings. The report of the hearing judge shall become the final order of the Board within 30 days after such report by the hearing examiner, unless within such period any Board member has directed that such report shall be reviewed by the Board.

Every official act of the Board shall be entered on record, and its hearings and records shall be open to the public.

The Board is authorized to make such rules as are necessary for the orderly transaction of its proceedings. Unless the Board has adopted a different rule, its proceedings shall be in accordance with the rules promulgated by the Supreme Court for the Superior Courts.

The office of the Board shall be located in Montpelier, but proceedings shall be held at places within the State convenient to persons appearing before it.

The compensation of members of the Board shall be fixed by the Commissioner of Human Resources.

The Board shall be attached to the Governor’s office for administrative purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

1981, No. 34

, § 1;

2003, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 231.
Employee rights.

No person shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against any employee because such employee has filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter or has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of the exercise by such employee on behalf of himself, herself, or others of any right afforded by this chapter.

Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this section may, within 30 days after such violation occurs, file a complaint with the Commissioner alleging such discrimination. Upon receipt of such complaint, the Commissioner shall cause such investigation to be made as he or she deems appropriate. If upon such investigation, the Commissioner determines that the provisions of this section have been violated, he or she shall bring an action in any appropriate State court against such person. In any such action, the State courts shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown to restrain violations of subsection (a) of this section and order all appropriate relief, including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to his or her former position with back pay.

Within 90 days of the receipt of a complaint filed under this section, the Commissioner shall notify the complainant of his or her determination under subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 232.
Private right of action.

An employee aggrieved by a violation of section 231 of this title may bring an action in Superior Court for appropriate relief, including reinstatement, triple wages, damages, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees.
Such an action may be brought in addition to or in lieu of an action under section 231 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.).